Utah statutes.
17-53-106.   Supervision of county elected officers -- Legislative body and executive may examine and audit accounts and conduct investigation.

(1) As used in this section, "professional duties" means a county elected officer's functions, duties, and responsibilities specifically provided for by law and includes:

(a)  the exercise of professional judgment and discretion reasonably related to the officer's required functions, duties, and responsibilities; and

(b)  the management of deputies and other employees under the supervision of the elected officer under statute or county ordinance, policy, or regulation.

(2) (a)  A county legislative body and a county executive each:

(i)  may generally direct and supervise all elected county officers and employees to ensure compliance with general county administrative ordinances, rules, or policies;

(ii)  may not direct or supervise other elected county officers or their sworn deputies with respect to the performance of the professional duties of the officers or deputies;

(iii)  may examine and audit the accounts of all county officers having the care, management, collection, or distribution of money belonging to the county, appropriated to the county, or otherwise available for the county's use and benefit; and

(iv)  may investigate any matter pertaining to a county officer or to the county or its business or affairs, and may require the attendance of witnesses and take evidence in any such investigation.

(b)  In an investigation under Subsection (2)(a)(iv):

(i)  the county executive or any member of the county legislative body may issue subpoenas and administer oaths to witnesses; and

(ii)  if the county legislative body appoints members of the legislative body as a committee and confers on the committee power to hear or take evidence, the committee shall have the same power as the full county legislative body.

(3)  Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit the county executive or county legislative body from initiating an action for removal or prosecution of an elected county officer as provided by statute.



Amended by Chapter 11, 2002 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 185, 2002 General Session

